Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-471
Alcoholic liquor; drugs; consumption on duty.

Any person subject to this code who is found under the influence of alcoholic liquor or any drug while on duty, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 71, p. 1579.